Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 13. Municipal Corporations

§ 1. Incorporation; alteration of boundaries; merger; consolidation; dissolution; determination of local affairs; classification; referendum; liberal construction.

The legislature shall provide by general law, applicable to all cities and towns,

For the incorporation of cities,

For the methods by which city and town boundaries may be altered, and

For the procedures by which cities and towns may be merged, consolidated or dissolved; provided that existing laws on such subjects and laws pertaining to civil service, retirement, collective bargaining, the levying of taxes, excises, fees, or any other charges, whether or not applicable to all cities and towns on the effective date of this amendment, shall remain in effect until superseded by general law and such existing laws shall not be subject to charter ordinance.

All cities and towns are hereby empowered to determine their local affairs and government as established by ordinance passed by the governing body, subject to referendum when prescribed by the legislature, and further subject only to statutes uniformly applicable to all cities and towns, and to statutes prescribing limits of indebtedness. The levying of taxes, excises, fees, or any other charges shall be prescribed by the legislature. The legislature may not establish more than four (4) classes of cities and towns. Each city and town shall be governed by all other statutes, except as it may exempt itself by charter ordinance as hereinafter provided.

Each city or town may elect that the whole or any part of any statute, other than statutes uniformly applicable to all cities and towns and statutes prescribing limits of indebtedness, may not apply to such city or town. This exemption shall be by charter ordinance passed by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all members elected to the governing body of the city or town. Each such charter ordinance shall be titled and may provide that the whole or any part of any statute, which would otherwise apply to such city or town as specifically designated in the ordinance shall not apply to such city or town. Such ordinance may provide other provisions on the same subject. Every charter ordinance shall be published once each week for two consecutive weeks in the official city or town newspaper, if any, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town. No charter ordinance shall take effect until the sixtieth (60th) day after its final publication. If prior thereto, a petition, signed by a number of qualified electors of the city or town, equaling at least ten per cent (10%) of the number of votes cast at the last general municipal election, shall be filed in the office of the clerk of such city or town, demanding that such ordinance be submitted to referendum, then the ordinance shall not take effect unless approved by a majority of the electors voting thereon. Such referendum election shall be called within thirty (30) days and held within ninety (90) days after the petition is filed. An ordinance establishing procedures, and fixing the date of such election shall be passed by the governing body and published once each week for three (3) consecutive weeks in the official city or town newspaper, if any, otherwise in a newspaper of general circulation in the city or town. The question on the ballot shall be: “Shall Charter Ordinance No. . . . . . Entitled (stating the title of the ordinance) take effect?”. The governing body may submit, without a petition, any charter ordinance to referendum election under the procedures as previously set out. The charter ordinance shall take effect if approved by a majority of the electors voting thereon. An approved charter ordinance, after becoming effective, shall be recorded by the clerk in a book maintained for that purpose with a certificate of the procedures of adoption. A certified copy of the ordinance shall be filed with the secretary of state, who shall keep an index of such ordinances. Each charter ordinance enacted shall prevail over any prior act of the governing body of the city or town, and may be repealed or amended only by subsequent charter ordinance, or by enactments of the legislature applicable to all cities and towns.

The powers and authority granted to cities and towns, pursuant to this section, shall be liberally construed for the purpose of giving the largest measure of self-government to cities and towns. (As amended by Laws 1971, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 715.)

Cross references. —

As to municipal corporations generally, see title 15.

This section is popularly known as the home-rule amendment.

Police Protective Ass'n v. Rock Springs, 631 P.2d 433,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1981).

City or town can only exercise those powers expressly or impliedly conferred

by constitution or statute. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

Legislature has power to classify cities.

May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Classification based on population is sufficient basis in many cases,

but sound and sufficient reason must appear, and arbitrary classification based on population cannot be sustained. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1942).

Commission manager form does not create classification. —

Provision for commission manager form of government does not create a classification of cities within the intent of this section. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

Cities adopting commission form of government are not a class not contemplated herein. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

In considering constitutionality of statute creating second class city

and in determining what is reasonable or arbitrary classification, court may consider nearly contemporaneous enactment relating to cities of first class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300, 1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21 (Wyo. 1942).

Class within a class. —

Chapter 28, Laws 1897, was in violation of this section, insofar as cities organized under general laws were concerned because statute created a class within a class. May v. Laramie, 58 Wyo. 240, 131 P.2d 300, 1942 Wyo. LEXIS 21 (Wyo. 1942).

Uniform operation of statutes. —

A law operating uniformly on all cities of one class or all of several recognized classes is not unconstitutional. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92, 1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11 (Wyo. 1923).

Municipalities can join together under Joint Powers Act. —

There is no prohibition in the Wyoming constitution which would preclude the legislature from permitting political subdivisions of the state of Wyoming from joining together, as allowed by the Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

.Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Limitations on power to incur indebtedness. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Board of public utilities. —

Legislature may constitutionally grant to municipal corporation right to elect or appoint board of public utilities. Stewart v. Cheyenne, 60 Wyo. 497, 154 P.2d 355,

1944 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1944).

Police force. —

An act relating to, and prescribing a procedure to be followed in dismissing or demoting members of the police force, was held unconstitutional, as creating an arbitrary class of cities. McFarland v. Cheyenne, 48 Wyo. 86, 42 P.2d 413,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1935).

Section does not authorize city to establish nonprofit corporation

to purchase and resell to city facilities for water supply.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Fire and police civil service not “local affairs.” —

As the provisions of art. 1, ch. 5, title 15, relating to police and fire department civil service, are “statutes uniformly applicable to all cities and towns,” they must be complied with, despite subsection (b)'s authorization of cities and towns to “determine their local affairs and government.” Police Protective Ass'n v. Rock Springs, 631 P.2d 433,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 329

(Wyo. 1981).

Driving under the influence.—

In a case
involving two petitioners who were both convicted of driving under
the influence, the Supreme Court concluded that Laramie, Wyo., Mun.
Ordinance § 10.24.030(H) flouted the uniformly applicable statutes
governing traffic regulations and was therefore void. The City of
Laramie had created a minimum mandatory jail sentence for blood alcohol
content (BAC) results of 0.15% or more, which exceeded the minimum
punishment for the same BAC level under Wyoming law. Wofford v. City of Laramie, 2016 WY 59, 375 P.3d 740,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2016).

Convictions in municipal courts for driving while intoxicated are for violations of ordinances and not of state statutes,

even if the state statute is copied verbatim in the ordinance or if it is adopted as the ordinance by reference to it. State ex rel. Motor Vehicle Div. v. Holtz, 674 P.2d 732,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 394

(Wyo. 1983).

Applied

in

Coulter v. City of Rawlins, 662 P.2d 888,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

City of Rock Springs v. Police Protection Ass'n, 610 P.2d 975,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 261

(Wyo. 1980); Cook v. Zoning Bd. of Adjustment, 776 P.2d 181,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 148

(Wyo. 1989); City of Torrington v. Smith, 2016 WY 126, 386 P.3d 336,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 2016).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961).

Law reviews. —

For note on home rule as a solution for municipal problems, see 16 Wyo. L.J. 47 (1961).

For comment, “The Municipal Action Exemption to the Federal Antitrust Laws: Increased Antitrust Exposure for Wyoming Cities and Towns,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 673 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For article, “No Home on the Range for Home Rule,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 791 (1996).

§ 2. Consent of electors necessary.

No municipal corporation shall be organized without the consent of the majority of the electors residing within the district proposed to be so incorporated, such consent to be ascertained in the manner and under such regulations as may be prescribed by law.

This section was not self-executing,

and did not, without legislation to carry it into effect, by implication repeal the then existing law authorizing incorporation of towns or application of 30 electors. State ex rel. Vidal v. Lamoureux, 3 Wyo. 731, 30 P. 243,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1892).

Prohibitions of this section do not relate to irrigation districts.

Sullivan v. Blakesley, 35 Wyo. 73, 246 P. 918,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1926).

Bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections is unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Cited

in

Mestas v. Diamond Coal & Coke Co., 12 Wyo. 414, 76 P. 567,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1904).

§ 3. Restriction on powers to levy taxes and contract debts.

The legislature shall restrict the powers of such corporations to levy taxes and assessments, to borrow money and contract debts so as to prevent the abuse of such power, and no tax or assessment shall be levied or collected or debts contracted by municipal corporations except in pursuance of law for public purposes specified by law.

Cross references. —

For another limitation on power of cities to levy taxes, see art. 15, § 6, Wyo. Const.

Municipalities, in their right to tax, are tightly hemmed

in this section. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And have only powers delegated by legislature. —

Such entities as counties and municipalities have no inherent powers but only those specially delegated to them by legislative action. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Limitations on power to incur indebtedness. —

Specific constitutional limitations on power of municipal corporation to incur indebtedness do not prevent legislature from imposing additional restrictions. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

Authority to borrow money and issue bonds. —

Town council, without approval by vote of the people, does not have authority to borrow money to pay for municipal light and power plant and to issue bonds payable solely from revenues accruing from operation of plant. Whipps v. Greybull, 56 Wyo. 355, 109 P.2d 805,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1941).

This section does not prohibit municipal corporation from borrowing within applicable limitations of art.

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Voting at bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections in unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Refunding authorized by General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law is for a public purpose,

as required by this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Purchasing public utility plant. —

Power to purchase public utility plant accorded cities and towns by ch. 78, Laws 1933, does not imply a power also to finance that purchase in a manner which legislature has persistently refused to recognize. Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

Town did not have power to issue revenue bonds to purchase power company property, especially where such property had over half the assessed value of all taxable property and town already had bonded indebtedness of $53,000 and the school district, of $66,000. Jensen v. Afton, 59 Wyo. 500, 143 P.2d 190,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1943).

Occupation tax. —

Where an occupation tax was authorized by § 15-1-103(a)(xiii), it must be said that it was enacted in pursuance of law within the meaning of this section. City of Rawlins v. Frontier Ref. Co., 396 P.2d 740,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1964).

Permit fee for motor caravans. —

A city has the power to enact all ordinances, not inconsistent with the laws of the state, for the general welfare of such cities, including an ordinance for regulation and supervision of motor caravans, which involved the exaction of a permit fee. Kenosha Auto Transp. Corp. v. Cheyenne, 55 Wyo. 298, 100 P.2d 109,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1940).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Quoted

in

Mariano & Assocs. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 737 P.2d 323,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 444

(Wyo. 1987); K N Energy, Inc. v. City of Casper, 755 P.2d 207,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Vidal v. Lamoureux, 3 Wyo. 731, 30 P. 243,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(1892).

§ 4. Franchises.

No street passenger railway, telegraph, telephone or electric light line shall be constructed within the limits of any municipal organization without the consent of its local authorities.

Legislature and this section give cities extensive control over electric utilities

within their boundaries. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 584 P.2d 995,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1978).

City immune from antitrust liability for denying franchise. —

Under the “state action” doctrine as applied to the laws of the state, the city was immune from antitrust liability for denying plaintiff a franchise for electric service within the city while granting defendant a monopoly. Rural Electric Co. v. Cheyenne Light, Fuel & Power Co., 602 F. Supp. 105, 1983 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 18645 (D. Wyo. 1983), aff'd, 762 F.2d 847, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 31246 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

An antitrust action by a power company against another power company and a municipality, following the issuance by the public service commission to the defendant-power company of a nonexclusive franchise to serve the municipality, alleging an anticompetitive conspiracy to keep the plaintiff-power company out of the municipality, was dismissed under the “state action” immunity doctrine. Rural Electric Co. v. Cheyenne Light, Fuel & Power Co., 762 F.2d 847, 1985 U.S. App. LEXIS 31246 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1985).

Jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and public utility in contract dispute. —

Courts, rather than the public service commission, have jurisdiction to adjudicate rights between city and public utility in contract dispute between them. Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974).

Law reviews. —

For article, “State Jurisdiction over the Regulation of Energy Distribution and Other Public Utility Services,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 535 (1980).

§ 5. Acquisition of water rights.

Municipal corporations shall have the same right as individuals to acquire rights by prior appropriation and otherwise to the use of water for domestic and municipal purposes, and the legislature shall provide by law for the exercise upon the part of incorporated cities, towns and villages of the right of eminent domain for the purpose of acquiring from prior appropriators upon the payment of just compensation, such water as may be necessary for the well being thereof and for domestic uses.

Cross references. —

As to irrigation and water rights generally, see art. 8, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const. See also title 41.

Supreme court judgments established rule of property. —

Supreme court judgments establishing rights of municipality in waters of stream as prior appropriator established rule of property which would not be overruled where city had expended large sums of money in reliance thereon and could have condemned prior rights at reasonable amount before times of water scarcity. Van Tassel Real Estate & Livestock Co. v. Cheyenne, 49 Wyo. 333, 54 P.2d 906,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 299 U.S. 574, 57 S. Ct. 38, 81 L. Ed. 423, 1936 U.S. LEXIS 282 (U.S. 1936); Application of Beaver Dam Ditch Co., 54 Wyo. 459, 93 P.2d 934,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1939).

Deed conveying use of water held enforceable. —

A deed by which appropriators conveyed the use of all the water to which grantor was entitled on alternate weeks is enforceable as against a subsequent appropriator, where no more water was shown to have been used than they could use beneficially. Johnston v. Little Horse Creek Irrigating Co., 13 Wyo. 208, 79 P. 22,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1904).

Applied

in

Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of owner of land not originally taken or purchased as part of adjacent project to recover, on enlargement of project to include adjacent land, enhanced value of property by reason of proximity to original land, 95 ALR3d 752.